Tennessee, session 114, HB2071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-401(d), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(d) Beginning on the second Sunday in March of 2027, this state and its political
subdivisions shall observe standard time as provided in 15 U.S.C. §§ 261-263 at all
times throughout the year, and each year thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2071
010252
- 1 -